en: French vegetables
de: Französisches Gemüse
es: Verduras francesas
fr: Légumes français
hr: Francusko povrće

en: Pumpkins and their products, Squashes and their products
de: Kürbisse und Kürbisprodukte
es: Calabazas y derivados
fi: kurpitsat ja kurpitsatuotteet
fr: Courges et dérivés, Potirons et dérivés, Citrouilles et dérivés
hr: Bundeve i proizvodi od njih
hu: Sütőtök és sütőtök alapú termékei
it: Zucca e derivati
lt: Moliūgai ir jų produktai
nl: Pompoen en afgeleide producten

en: Tomatoes and their products, Tomatoes and tomato products
bg: Домати и доматени продукти
ca: Tomàquets i productes de tomàquet, Tomàquets i productes derivats
de: Tomaten und Tomatenprodukte
es: Tomates y sus productos, Tomates y derivados
fi: tomaatit ja tomaattituotteet
fr: Tomates et dérivés
he: עגבניות ומוצריהן
hr: Rajčice i njihovih proizvoda
hu: Paradicsom és pradicsom alapú termékek
it: Pomodori e prodotti derivati
la: Solanum lycopersicum, Lycopersicon lycopersicum, Lycopersicon esculentum
nl: Tomaten en afgeleide producten
pl: Pomidory i produkty z pomidorów
pt: Tomates e derivados
ru: Помидоры и продукты из помидор
zh: 番茄及其制品

en: Canned vegetables
bg: Зеленчукови консерви
ca: Vegetals enllaunats
da: Dåsegrøntsager, grøntsager på dåse
de: Gemüsekonserven, Dosengemüse
es: Verduras y hortalizas en conserva, Hortalizas en conserva, Verduras en conserva, Conservas de vegetales
fi: purkitetut kasvikset
fr: Légumes en conserve, conserves de légumes
hr: Konzervirano povrće
hu: Zöldségkonzervek
it: Verdure in scatola
nl: Groenten in blik/pot, Groenteconserven
pl: Warzywa w puszcze
pt: Vegetais enlatados
ru: Консервированные овощи, Овощи консервированные, Консервы из овощей
th: ผักกระป๋อง
zh: 罐头蔬菜

en: Canned artichokes
de: Artischocken in Dosen, Dosen-Artischocken
es: Alcachofas en conserva
fi: purkitetut artisokat
fr: Artichauts en conserve, Artichauts appertisés
hr: Konzervirane artičoke
it: Carciofi in scatola
nl: Artisjokken en blik/pot

en: Canned artichoke hearts
fr: Coeurs d'artichaut en conserve, Coeurs d'artichaut appertisés

en: Canned artichoke base
fr: Fonds d'artichaut en conserve, Fonds d'artichaut appertisés

en: Marinated canned artichokes
nl: Gemarineerde artisjokken in blik/pot

en: Canned Brussels sprouts
es: Coles de Bruselas en conserva
fr: Choux de Bruxelles en conserve, Choux de Bruxelles appertisés
hr: Konzervirane prokulice
nl: Spruiten in blik/pot

en: Canned carrots
bg: Консервирани моркови
de: Karotten in Dosen, Dosenkarotten
es: Zanahorias en conserva
fi: purkitetut porkkanat
fr: Carottes en conserve, Carottes appertisées
hr: Konzervirana mrkva
it: Carote in scatola
nl: Wortels in blik

en: Canned cauliflowers, canned cauliflower
es: Coliflor en conserva
fr: Choux-fleurs en conserve
hr: Konzervirana cvjetača
nl: Bloemkool in blik/pot

en: Canned celery
bg: Консервирана целина
de: Dosen-Sellerie, Sellerie aus der Dose
es: Apio en conserva
fr: Céleri en conserve
hr: Konzervirani celer
nl: Selderij in blik/pot

en: Canned cabbage
de: Kohl in Dosen
es: Repollo en conserva
fr: Choux en conserve
hr: Kupus iz konzerve
nl: Kool in blik/pot

en: Canned chards
es: Acelgas en conserva
fr: Bettes en conserve, Blettes en conserve
hr: Konzervirane blitve
nl: Snijbiet in blik/pot

en: Canned diced mixed vegetables
fr: Macédoines de légumes en conserve, macédoines de légume en conserve, macédoine de légumes en conserve, macédoine de légume en conserve, Macédoines de légumes appertisées

en: Canned leeks
es: Puerros en conserva
fr: Poireaux en conserve
hr: Poriluk iz konzerve
nl: Prei in blik/pot

en: Canned turnips
fr: Navets en conserve

en: Canned peppers
bg: Чушки от консерва
de: Paprika aus der Dose
es: Pimientos en conserva
fi: purkitetut chilipaprikat
fr: Poivrons en conserve
hr: Konzervirana paprika
it: Peperoni in scatola
nl: Pepers in blik/pot

en: Canned potatoes
bg: Картофи от консерва
da: Dåsekartofler, Kartofler på dåse
es: Patatas en conserva
fr: Pommes de terre en conserve, Pommes de terre appertisées
hr: Konzervirani krumpir
it: Patate in scatola
nl: Aardappel in blik/pot
pt: Batatas em lata
sv: Potatisar på burk, Burkpotatisar

en: Canned new potatoes
da: Nye kartofler på dåse
fr: Pommes de terres nouvelles en conserve
sv: Nya potatisar på burk